src/fst/bla_verb_full.lexc
LEXICON Root
PREFIX_SETS ;

! Blackfoot Regular Verb Morphology

! Desired input-output
! Input: @U.person.NI@ 0
! Output: @U.person.NI@ nit 
! -> LEXC: @U.person.NI@0:@U.person.NI@ nit

LEXICON Root
PREFIX_SETS ;

LEXICON PREFIX_SETS
@P.class.VAI@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VII@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VTI@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VTA@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_PREFIXES
@P.mode.IND@	BASIC_IND_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.CON@	BASIC_CNJ_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.SUB@	BASIC_SBJ_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.IRR@	BASIC_IRR_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.IMP@	BASIC_IMP_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IND_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@kit%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0 PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_CNJ_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%<     PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0    PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_SBJ_PREFIXES
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0	PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IRR_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0    PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IMP_PREFIXES
@P.person.IMP@:@P.person.IMP@0    PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BOUND
:%< PREFIXES ;

! Blackfoot Regular VAI Stems

! Below are the regular VAI stems and their past tense forms. 
! They are organized as prefixed and non-prefixed forms 

! LEXICON VERB_STEMS
LEXICON PREFIXES
@R.class.VAI@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTI@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTA@	VTA_STEMS ;

!! Now we collect the verb stems !!

! This file contains the Blackfoot verb stems. They are organized by their inflectional class.

LEXICON PREFIXES2
PV/saw+:saw											BOUND ;
PV/wayák+:wayák	BOUND ;
PV/yáak+:yáak	BOUND ;
PV/ayáak+:ayáak	BOUND ;
PV/akaa+:akaa	BOUND ;
PV/Xomohp+:Xomohp	BOUND ;
PV/Xomoht+:Xomoht	BOUND ;
PV/Xohtatsiwa+:Xohtatsiwa	BOUND ;
PV/itap+:itap	BOUND ;
PV/poohsap+:poohsap	BOUND ;
PV/i2poohsap+:i2poohsap	BOUND ;
PV/it+:it	BOUND ;
PV/ist+:ist	BOUND ;
PV/ípssit+:ípssit	BOUND ;
PV/ohkit+:ohkit	BOUND ;
PV/miistap+:miistap	BOUND ;
PV/yi2i2stap+:yi2i2stap	BOUND ;
PV/saaki+:saaki	BOUND ;
PV/omá+:omá	BOUND ;
PV/iimá+:iimá	BOUND ;
PV/á7+:á7	BOUND ;
PV/á+:á	BOUND ;
PV/ááhk+:ááhk	BOUND ;
PV/iiht+:iiht	BOUND ;
PV/oht+:oht	BOUND ;
PV/omoht+:omoht	BOUND ;
PV/á7+:á7	BOUND ;
PV/á7+:á7	BOUND ;
PV/ikkam+:ikkam	BOUND ;
PV/Xoohk+:Xoohk	BOUND ;
PV/Xipp+:Xipp	BOUND ;
PV/iik+:iik	BOUND ;
PV/sska7+:sska7	BOUND ;
PV/sstónnat+:sstónnat	BOUND ;
PV/i2kkam+:i2kkam	BOUND ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist	BOUND ;
PV/ii+:ii	BOUND ;
PV/na+:na	BOUND ;
PV/hkana+:hkana	BOUND ;
PV/i2kkina+:i2kkina	BOUND ;
PV/iiyik+:iiyik	BOUND ;
PV/i2poina+:i2poina	BOUND ;
PV/poína+:poína	BOUND ;
PV/sok+:sok	BOUND ;
PV/niit+:niit	BOUND ;
PV/anist+:anist	BOUND ;
PV/ohs+:ohs	BOUND ;
PV/yaahs+:yaahs	BOUND ;
PV/i2ksistt+:i2ksistt	BOUND ;
PV/mato+:mato	BOUND ;
PV/oto+:oto	BOUND ;
PV/ohkott+:ohkott	BOUND ;
PV/ssáak+:ssáak	BOUND ;
PV/ohko+:ohko	BOUND ;
PV/á+:á	BOUND ;
PV/a+:a	BOUND ;
PV/á’+:á’	BOUND ;
PV/a’kooht+:a’kooht	BOUND ;
PV/á’p+:á’p	BOUND ;
PV/ááhk+:ááhk	BOUND ;
PV/ááhkamá’p+:ááhkamá’p	BOUND ;
PV/aahksikkam+:aahksikkam	BOUND ;
PV/ááhksikkama’p+:ááhksikkama’p	BOUND ;
PV/aahs+:aahs	BOUND ;
PV/áák+:áák	BOUND ;
PV/aaksta’+:aaksta’	BOUND ;
PV/aanist+:aanist	BOUND ;
PV/ai’tamáak+:ai’tamáak	BOUND ;
PV/áísooka+:áísooka	BOUND ;
PV/aisskahs+:aisskahs	BOUND ;
PV/áka+:áka	BOUND ;
PV/ákáá+:ákáá	BOUND ;
PV/akisspí+:akisspí	BOUND ;
PV/akk+:akk	BOUND ;
PV/akoksska+:akoksska	BOUND ;
PV/ákstam+:ákstam	BOUND ;
PV/ama+:ama	BOUND ;
PV/amo’tap+:amo’tap	BOUND ;
PV/ana+:ana	BOUND ;
PV/anaw+:anaw	BOUND ;
PV/ano+:ano	BOUND ;
PV/anow+:anow	BOUND ;
PV/anow+:anow	BOUND ;
PV/anootap+:anootap	BOUND ;
PV/ao’tamáak+:ao’tamáak	BOUND ;
PV/apa’p+:apa’p	BOUND ;
PV/aso+:aso	BOUND ;
PV/assaak+:assaak	BOUND ;
PV/att+:att	BOUND ;
PV/awa’+:awa’	BOUND ;
PV/ayaak+:ayaak	BOUND ;
PV/ayak+:ayak	BOUND ;
PV/i’sskaan+:i’sskaan	BOUND ;
PV/i’tsk+:i’tsk	BOUND ;
PV/iámoohk+:iámoohk	BOUND ;
PV/ihta+:ihta	BOUND ;
PV/iihk+:iihk	BOUND ;
PV/iihtsitok+:iihtsitok	BOUND ;
PV/iihtsitssitak+:iihtsitssitak	BOUND ;
PV/iik+:iik	BOUND ;
PV/iikska’+:iikska’	BOUND ;
PV/iima+:iima	BOUND ;
PV/iimaa+:iimaa	BOUND ;
PV/iimat+:iimat	BOUND ;
PV/iin+:iin	BOUND ;
PV/iina+:iina	BOUND ;
PV/iinao’k+:iinao’k	BOUND ;
PV/iinatt+:iinatt	BOUND ;
PV/iini+:iini	BOUND ;
PV/iinik+:iinik	BOUND ;
PV/iitaisap+:iitaisap	BOUND ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist	BOUND ;
PV/iitskimaan+:iitskimaan	BOUND ;
PV/iiyik+:iiyik	BOUND ;
PV/íka+:íka	BOUND ;
PV/ika’+:ika’	BOUND ;
PV/ika’to+:ika’to	BOUND ;
PV/ikaap+:ikaap	BOUND ;
PV/ikaiksist+:ikaiksist	BOUND ;
PV/ikak+:ikak	BOUND ;
PV/ikamo’t+:ikamo’t	BOUND ;
PV/ikapo+:ikapo	BOUND ;
PV/ikayiss+:ikayiss	BOUND ;
PV/ikia’ya+:ikia’ya	BOUND ;
PV/ikihkiht+:ikihkiht	BOUND ;
PV/ikimm+:ikimm	BOUND ;
PV/ikimmat+:ikimmat	BOUND ;
PV/ikipp+:ikipp	BOUND ;
PV/ikippa’+:ikippa’	BOUND ;
PV/ikíppoa+:ikíppoa	BOUND ;
PV/ikkam+:ikkam	BOUND ;
PV/ikkam+:ikkam	BOUND ;
PV/ikkan+:ikkan	BOUND ;
PV/ikkia’+:ikkia’	BOUND ;
PV/ikkihkini+:ikkihkini	BOUND ;
PV/ikkina+:ikkina	BOUND ;
PV/iksissto+:iksissto	BOUND ;
PV/iksissto+:iksissto	BOUND ;
PV/iksist+:iksist	BOUND ;
PV/iksksowa’+:iksksowa’	BOUND ;
PV/ikssto+:ikssto	BOUND ;
PV/ikstsina’+:ikstsina’	BOUND ;
PV/imaat+:imaat	BOUND ;
PV/imak+:imak	BOUND ;
PV/immoyi+:immoyi	BOUND ;
PV/inai’t+:inai’t	BOUND ;
PV/inikk+:inikk	BOUND ;
PV/innaahkoot+:innaahkoot	BOUND ;
PV/ipahkitap+:ipahkitap	BOUND ;
PV/ipahtsik+:ipahtsik	BOUND ;
PV/ipákkssa+:ipákkssa	BOUND ;
PV/ipakska+:ipakska	BOUND ;
PV/ipana+:ipana	BOUND ;
PV/ipann+:ipann	BOUND ;
PV/ipapa+:ipapa	BOUND ;
PV/ipiitsiiyóóhk+:ipiitsiiyóóhk	BOUND ;
PV/ipiitsiw+:ipiitsiw	BOUND ;
PV/ipo’t+:ipo’t	BOUND ;
PV/ipoina+:ipoina	BOUND ;
PV/ipp+:ipp	BOUND ;
PV/ippita+:ippita	BOUND ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa	BOUND ;
PV/ippssa’kapp+:ippssa’kapp	BOUND ;
PV/ipsstsík+:ipsstsík	BOUND ;
PV/ipsstsikatt+:ipsstsikatt	BOUND ;
PV/isimi+:isimi	BOUND ;
PV/isinap+:isinap	BOUND ;
PV/isitsip+:isitsip	BOUND ;
PV/isk+:isk	BOUND ;
PV/iss+:iss	BOUND ;
PV/isska’+:isska’	BOUND ;
PV/isstohkana+:isstohkana	BOUND ;
PV/ista’+:ista’	BOUND ;
PV/istohk+:istohk	BOUND ;
PV/istohkana+:istohkana	BOUND ;
PV/istsa’+:istsa’	BOUND ;
PV/istto’t+:istto’t	BOUND ;
PV/isttsikohpo+:isttsikohpo	BOUND ;
PV/isttsitsa+:isttsitsa	BOUND ;
PV/isttssi+:isttssi	BOUND ;
PV/itáak+:itáak	BOUND ;
PV/ito’t+:ito’t	BOUND ;
PV/iton+:iton	BOUND ;
PV/itsisa+:itsisa	BOUND ;
PV/itsk+:itsk	BOUND ;
PV/itsst+:itsst	BOUND ;
PV/káák+:káák	BOUND ;
PV/kaat+:kaat	BOUND ;
PV/káátsisto+:káátsisto	BOUND ;
PV/káátsisto+:káátsisto	BOUND ;
PV/kakanott+:kakanott	BOUND ;
PV/kam+:kam	BOUND ;
PV/kan+:kan	BOUND ;
PV/káta’+:káta’	BOUND ;
PV/kínnak+:kínnak	BOUND ;
PV/kipita+:kipita	BOUND ;
PV/kipp+:kipp	BOUND ;
PV/kotski+:kotski	BOUND ;
PV/ksisttoyi+:ksisttoyi	BOUND ;
PV/maak+:maak	BOUND ;
PV/máak+:máak	BOUND ;
PV/maam+:maam	BOUND ;
PV/maat+:m2aat	BOUND ;
PV/máát+:m2áát  BOUND ;
PV/máátaommita’p+:m2áátaommita’p	BOUND ;
PV/mak+:mak	BOUND ;
PV/máo’k+:máo’k	BOUND ;
PV/mato+:mato	BOUND ;
PV/matsowá’p+:matsowá’p	BOUND ;
PV/matt+:m2att	BOUND ;
PV/mátt+:m2átt	BOUND ;
PV/mattsistá’+:m2attsistá’	BOUND ;
PV/máttsit+:m2áttsit	BOUND ;
PV/mi’kotsi+:mi’kotsi	BOUND ;
PV/miiksist+:miiksist	BOUND ;
PV/miin+:miin	BOUND ;
PV/min+:min	BOUND ;
PV/missk+:missk	BOUND ;
PV/misst+:misst	BOUND ;
PV/mo’tóí+:mo’tóí	BOUND ;
PV/naat+:naat	BOUND ;
PV/nai’t+:nai’t	BOUND ;
PV/niistsikáp+:niistsikáp	BOUND ;
PV/niit+:niit	BOUND ;
PV/niit+:niit	BOUND ;
PV/niitá’p+:niitá’p	BOUND ;
PV/níítaak+:níítaak	BOUND ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi	BOUND ;
PV/niitsskimaan+:niitsskimaan	BOUND ;
PV/noohk+:noohk	BOUND ;
PV/noohkátt+:noohkátt	BOUND ;
PV/o’kia’p+:o’kia’p	BOUND ;
PV/o’kio+:o’kio	BOUND ;
PV/o’tap+:o’tap	BOUND ;
PV/o’to+:o’to	BOUND ;
PV/ohk+:ohk	BOUND ;
PV/ohkan+:ohkan	BOUND ;
PV/ohkana+:ohkana	BOUND ;
PV/ohko+:ohko	BOUND ;
PV/ohkott+:ohkott	BOUND ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii	BOUND ;
PV/ohpiistap+:ohpiistap	BOUND ;
PV/ohpo’kii+:ohpo’kii	BOUND ;
PV/ohpok+:ohpok	BOUND ;
PV/oka’p+:oka’p	BOUND ;
PV/oma+:oma	BOUND ;
PV/omaa+:omaa	BOUND ;
PV/omahka+:omahka	BOUND ;
PV/omanista+:omanista	BOUND ;
PV/omat+:omat	BOUND ;
PV/omi+:omi	BOUND ;
PV/omiiksist+:omiiksist	BOUND ;
PV/omo’tap+:omo’tap	BOUND ;
PV/on+:on	BOUND ;
PV/ona’+:ona’	BOUND ;
PV/onai’t+:onai’t	BOUND ;
PV/onaki+:onaki	BOUND ;
PV/oohk+:oohk	BOUND ;
PV/oohkanistta+:oohkanistta	BOUND ;
PV/oohkatt+:oohkatt	BOUND ;
PV/opaksikssto+:opaksikssto	BOUND ;
PV/otam+:otam	BOUND ;
PV/oto+:oto	BOUND ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk	BOUND ;
PV/piin+:piin	BOUND ;
PV/piitsiyoohk+:piitsiyoohk	BOUND ;
PV/pin+:pin	BOUND ;
PV/po’kí+:po’kí	BOUND ;
PV/poina+:poina	BOUND ;
PV/sa+:sa	BOUND ;
PV/sa+:sa	BOUND ;
PV/saa+:saa	BOUND ;
PV/saaki+:saaki	BOUND ;
PV/saapo’kit+:saapo’kit	BOUND ;
PV/saipa’+:saipa’	BOUND ;
PV/sáótat+:sáótat	BOUND ;
PV/sipi+:sipi	BOUND ;
PV/sook+:sook	BOUND ;
PV/sootam+:sootam	BOUND ;
PV/sotám+:sotám	BOUND ;
PV/soyi+:soyi	BOUND ;
PV/ssáak+:ssáak	BOUND ;
PV/ssap+:ssap	BOUND ;
PV/sska’+:sska’	BOUND ;
PV/sspi+:sspi	BOUND ;
PV/sstahpik+:sstahpik	BOUND ;
PV/sstok+:sstok	BOUND ;
PV/sstonnat+:sstonnat	BOUND ;
PV/sstsina’+:sstsina’	BOUND ;
PV/stam+:stam	BOUND ;
PV/tatsiki+:tatsiki	BOUND ;
PV/waahki+:waahki	BOUND ;
PV/waahko+:waahko	BOUND ;
PV/waahto+:waahto	BOUND ;
PV/waahtsam+:waahtsam	BOUND ;
PV/waahtso+:waahtso	BOUND ;
PV/waako’tsi+:waako’tsi	BOUND ;
PV/waaksisto+:waaksisto	BOUND ;
PV/waanaoyit+:waanaoyit	BOUND ;
PV/waanook+:waanook	BOUND ;
PV/waapiiwaan+:waapiiwaan	BOUND ;
PV/wáyák+:wáyák	BOUND ;
PV/wayákiit+:wayákiit	BOUND ;
PV/yáak+:yáak	BOUND ;
PV/yámoohk+:yámoohk	BOUND ;
PV/yoisstsikina+:yoisstsikina	BOUND ;
PV/yook+:yook	BOUND ;
